DI-392

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM
DI29E-07
DTC Always ON Malfunction in ECU

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either ofthefollowing (1) through (3) is detected:  Battery

Al ON (1) The ECU connectors are OFF fromthe ECU. «ICregulator

ways (2) Thereis amalfunctioninthe ECU internal circuit. * Power source circuit

(8) Thevoltage ofterminallG 1 ismorethan 18.5V. *ABSECU

HINT:

Thereisacasethathand
Fail safe function:

—held tester cannot be used when ECU is abnormal.

If trouble occurs in the ECU, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits ABS control.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check that the ECU connectors are securely connected to the ECU.

NO> Connect the connector to the ECU.

YES

2 [Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI-312.

@

3 |Is normal code displayed?

YES> Repair circuit indicated by the output code .

harness and connector between solenoid relay
and check connector (See page IN-24).

YES> Check solenoid relay. Check for short circuit in

@

4 | Does ABS warning light go off?

connector between ECU-IG fuse and ECU (See
page IN-24).

YES> Check for open or short circuit in harness and
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5 | Check battery voltage.

CHECK:
(@) Start the engine.
(b)  Check the battery voltage.
OK:
Voltage: 10 - 16 V

@

6 | Check operation of the ABS warning light.

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

IN CASE OF USING HAND-HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand-held tester.
CHECK:
Check that "ON” and "OFF” of the ABS warning light can be shown on the combination meter by the hand-
held tester.
IN CASE OF NOT USING HAND-HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(@)  Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the connector from the ABS ECU.
(¢) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check the ABS warning light condition when pushing in and pulling out the short pin from the check connec-
tor.
OK:
When the short pin is pulled out: ABS warning light goes off
When the short pin is pushed in: ABS warning light goes on

e ]

Check for short circuit in harness and connector between combination meter and ABS ECU, com-
bination meter and check connector (See page IN-24).
Check ABS solenoid relay circuit (See page DI-335).

OK> Check and replace ABS ECU.
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